extractor-results/20251025-222952/apertium-ido.ido.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" />
    <sdef n="adj" />
    <sdef n="adv" />
    <sdef n="vblex" />
    <sdef n="pr" />
    <sdef n="prn" />
    <sdef n="det" />
    <sdef n="num" />
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" />
    <sdef n="cnjsub" />
    <sdef n="ij" />
    <sdef n="sg" />
    <sdef n="pl" />
    <sdef n="sp" />
    <sdef n="nom" />
    <sdef n="acc" />
    <sdef n="inf" />
    <sdef n="pri" />
    <sdef n="pii" />
    <sdef n="fti" />
    <sdef n="cni" />
    <sdef n="imp" />
    <sdef n="p1" />
    <sdef n="p2" />
    <sdef n="p3" />
    <sdef n="m" />
    <sdef n="f" />
    <sdef n="mf" />
    <sdef n="nt" />
    <sdef n="np" />
    <sdef n="ant" />
    <sdef n="cog" />
    <sdef n="top" />
    <sdef n="al" />
    <sdef n="ciph" />
    <sdef n="percent" />
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ala__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ale</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="oza__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oza</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oze</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="iva__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iva</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ajo__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajo</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aji</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajon</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="acc" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajin</l>
          <r>
            <s n="n" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="acc" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="inf" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="pri" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="sg" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="pii" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="sg" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="fti" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="sg" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="imp" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>
            <s n="vblex" />
            <s n="cni" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="sg" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anta</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ante</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inta</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inte</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onta</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onte</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ata</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ate</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ita</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ota</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adj" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ote</l>
          <r>
            <s n="adv" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="num_regex">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
            <s n="ciph" />
            <s n="sp" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
            <s n="ciph" />
            <s n="sp" />
            <s n="acc" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*%</re>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
            <s n="percent" />
            <s n="sp" />
            <s n="nom" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*%</re>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="num" />
            <s n="percent" />
            <s n="sp" />
            <s n="acc" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pr" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="det" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="prn" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="cnjcoo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="cnjsub" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
